New York, session 2025-2026, A1529.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Legislative findings. a. The legislature hereby finds and 2 declares that lead poisoning of children persists as one of the most 3 prevalent and preventable environmental diseases in New York state. 4 Nearly 100,000 children were newly identified with levels of lead in 5 their blood at five micrograms per deciliter (mcg/dL) in New York state 6 between 2011 and 2015. 7 b. Medical research indicates that children can suffer permanent brain 8 damage at blood levels even lower than 5 mcg/dL, and that there is no 9 level of lead ingestion that is without adverse impact; indeed, in 2021 10 the federal Centers for Disease Control and Prevention revised the blood 11 lead reference level downward to 3.5 mcg/dL. 12 c. Black children and children from low-income households are consist- 13 ently found to have higher levels of lead in their blood than their 14 white peers or their peers from higher income households. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD03092-02-5 A. 1529--A 2 1 d. The predominant cause of lead poisoning in young children is the 2 ingestion of lead particles from deteriorating or abraded lead-based 3 paint from older and poorly maintained residences. Although New York 4 state banned the sale of lead-based paint in 1970, (l.1970, ch. 338) 74% 5 of New York's housing stock was constructed prior to 1970 and lead-based 6 paint was available outside of the state until 1978. New York state has 7 both the nation's greatest number (over 4 million units), the highest 8 percentage (55.08%) of pre-1960 and pre-1950 (41.0%) housing, and the 9 oldest housing inventory among the fifty states. At least ninety percent 10 of lead-based paint still exists in occupied housing built before 1960. 11 New York state's older housing stock places residents at great risk of 12 exposure to lead hazards, with low-income children living in older hous- 13 ing having the highest risk of lead poisoning. 14 e. Knowledge of lead-based paint hazards, their control, mitigation, 15 abatement, and risk avoidance is not sufficiently widespread. In addi- 16 tion, while federal law requires the disclosure by sellers of real prop- 17 erty of knowledge of the existence of lead-based paint and lead-based 18 paint hazards, and encourages potential buyers to conduct inspections 19 for lead-based paint, these mechanisms neither mandate that such 20 inspections take place either by sellers or buyers. This gap in disclo- 21 sure requirements results in residential property being transferred 22 without any knowledge of the potential for such property to cause lead 23 poisoning and the attendant liabilities. 24 f. Local county health departments lack sufficient information as to 25 which housing contains lead-based paint and the locations of such lead- 26 based paint, resulting in less cost-effective prevention of lead poison- 27 ing, avoidable harm to children's health, and wasted public resources. 28 g. The purposes of this act are to assure that properties that have 29 not been previously tested for lead-based paint are not simply trans- 30 ferred to new owners without knowledge of whether there is lead-based 31 paint present, and to better utilize the existing federal laws that 32 mandate disclosure of lead-based paint and lead-based paint hazards and 33 to aid in the prevention of lead poisoning. This act is not intended to 34 and does not diminish the responsibility of buyers to carefully examine 35 the property which they intend to purchase and public records pertaining 36 to the property. This act is not intended to and does not limit existing 37 responsibilities by a seller, buyer or agent concerning the condition of 38 the property or potential liabilities or remedies at law, statute or in 39 equity. 40 This act will significantly improve the transfer process and better 41 serve the interests of all parties to a home purchase. It will increase 42 clarity regarding the nature of the property and will provide greater 43 certainty to contracts entered into by better informed buyers and sell- 44 ers. As well, it will provide incentive to owners to voluntarily test 45 their property prior to sale. 46 h. This act will complement existing state and local laws on lead 47 poisoning prevention. Section 1377 of the public health law, enacted in 48 2023, requires the department of health to develop a registry of all 49 rental residential dwellings with two or more units built before 1980 50 within communities of concern outside the city of New York, which will 51 also require such dwellings be inspected for lead hazards at least every 52 three years. This act will ensure equity of information for purchasers 53 of all residential property built prior to 1978 regardless of location 54 or number of units by ensuring that they receive information about the 55 presence of lead-based paint in dwellings they purchase. A. 1529--A 3 1 i. This act will require inspection reports that are developed to 2 comply with this act to be included on the registry of lead inspections 3 that the department of health is creating pursuant to section 1377 of 4 the public health law so that future renters and purchasers can learn 5 about lead-based paint in homes they are considering renting or purchas- 6 ing. 7 j. New York city has already added a requirement, subdivision a-1 of 8 section 27-2056.4 of the administrative code of the city of New York, 9 that all rental residential properties be tested one time for lead-based 10 paint by August 2025. This act will not require re-testing of these 11 residences when rental properties are sold; but will ensure equity and 12 protect purchasers of residential properties across the state (including 13 New York city) by requiring one-time testing for lead-based paint before 14 any residential property is sold. 15 § 2. The real property law is amended by adding a new article 17 to 16 read as follows: 17 ARTICLE 17 18 LEAD-BASED PAINT RIGHT TO KNOW ACT 19 Section 530. Short title. 20 531. Definitions. 21 532. Inspection of residential real property for lead-based 22 paint prior to transfer of title. 23 533. Duty of agent. 24 534. Liability. 25 § 530. Short title. This article shall be known and may be cited as 26 the "lead-based paint right to know act". 27 § 531. Definitions. As used in this article, the following terms shall 28 have the following meanings: 29 1. "Agent" shall mean a person who is licensed as a real estate broker 30 or a real estate salesperson pursuant to section four hundred forty-a of 31 this chapter and acting in a fiduciary capacity. 32 2. "Binding contract of sale" shall mean a real estate purchase 33 contract or offer that would, upon signing by the seller and subject to 34 satisfaction of any contingencies, require the buyer to accept a trans- 35 fer of title. 36 3. "Broker" shall have the same meaning as "real estate broker" 37 defined by section four hundred forty of this chapter. 38 4. "Buyer" shall mean any entity that enters into a real estate 39 purchase contract, including but not limited to individuals, partner- 40 ships, corporations, trusts, government agencies, housing agencies, 41 Indian tribes, and nonprofit organizations. 42 5. "Lead-based paint" shall mean paint or other similar surface coat- 43 ing material containing .50 milligrams of lead per square centimeter or 44 greater, as determined by laboratory analysis of paint samples with all 45 layers of paint present, or by an x-ray fluorescence analyzer. If an 46 x-ray fluorescence analyzer is used, readings shall be corrected for 47 substrate bias when necessary as specified by the performance character- 48 istic sheets released by the United States environmental protection 49 agency and the United States department of housing and urban development 50 for the specific x-ray fluorescence analyzer used. X-ray fluorescence 51 readings shall be classified as positive, negative or inconclusive in 52 accordance with the United States department of housing and urban devel- 53 opment guidelines for the evaluation and control of lead-based paint 54 hazards in housing (July 2012) or successor guidelines, and the perform- 55 ance characteristic sheets released by the United States environmental 56 protection agency and the United States department of housing and urban A. 1529--A 4 1 development for the specific x-ray fluorescence analyzer used. X-ray 2 fluorescence readings that fall within the inconclusive zone, as deter- 3 mined by the performance characteristic sheets, shall be confirmed by 4 laboratory analysis of paint chips, the measure of such laboratory anal- 5 ysis shall be definitive. Where a laboratory analysis of paint chips is 6 performed (including because an x-ray fluorescence reading is inconclu- 7 sive), the results shall be reported in percent by weight. In such 8 case, lead-based paint shall mean any paint or other similar surface- 9 coating material containing more than 0.009 percent (or 90 parts per 10 million) of metallic lead, based on the non-volatile content of the 11 paint or other similar surface-coating material. In the event that the 12 United States environmental protection agency or a successor agency, or 13 the United States department of housing and urban development or a 14 successor agency, or the United States consumer product safety commis- 15 sion or a successor agency, or a department or agency of the state of 16 New York that has obtained applicable authorization pursuant to 40 17 C.F.R. part 745 subpart Q or successor regulation, adopts more stringent 18 definitions of lead-based paint, such more stringent definitions shall 19 apply for the purposes of this article. 20 6. "Real estate purchase contract" shall mean any of the following: 21 (a) a contract which provides for the purchase and sale or exchange of 22 residential real property; 23 (b) a lease with an option to purchase residential real property; 24 (c) a lease-with-obligation-to-purchase agreement for residential real 25 property; or 26 (d) an installment land sale contract for residential real property. 27 7. "Residential real property" shall mean real property improved by a 28 residential dwelling erected prior to the year nineteen hundred seven- 29 ty-eight. 30 8. "Residential dwelling" shall mean a single-family dwelling, includ- 31 ing attached structures such as porches and stoops, or a single-family 32 dwelling unit within a structure that contains more than one separate 33 residential dwelling unit, used or occupied, or designed to be used or 34 occupied, wholly or partly, as the home or residence of one or more 35 persons whether or not it was or will be occupied. 36 9. "Seller" shall mean any entity that intends to engage in the trans- 37 fer of title to a buyer of residential real property, in whole or in 38 part, including but not limited to individuals, partnerships, corpo- 39 rations, trusts, government agencies, housing agencies, Indian tribes, 40 mortgage banker, lender, and nonprofit organizations. The term "seller" 41 also shall mean an entity that transfers shares in a cooperatively owned 42 project. 43 10. "Test for lead-based paint" shall mean a test for the presence of 44 lead-based paint that has been conducted through a lead-based paint 45 inspection as defined in 40 C.F.R. 745.103, 24 C.F.R. 35.86, and the 46 United States department of housing and urban development guidelines for 47 the evaluation and control of lead-based paint hazards in housing (July 48 2012), or successor regulations and guidelines, and a report prepared 49 indicating the results of such test, including the locations where tests 50 were performed for lead-based paint and the readings of all such tests. 51 Such test shall not be valid unless performed by a person accredited 52 pursuant to: (a) certification to conduct lead hazard risk assessment or 53 inspections by the United States environmental protection agency pursu- 54 ant to 40 C.F.R. 745.226(b) or successor regulation; or (b) certif- 55 ication by a state or tribal program authorized by the United States 56 environmental protection agency to certify individuals engaged in lead- A. 1529--A 5 1 based paint activities pursuant to 40 C.F.R. 745.325 or successor regu- 2 lation or eligible to conduct the inspections required by this article. 3 For multifamily housing, the test must be conducted in accordance with 4 the United States department of housing and urban development guidelines 5 for the evaluation and control of lead-based paint hazards in housing 6 (July 2012), or successor guidelines. Such inspection shall consist of 7 the use of an x-ray fluorescence analyzer on all types of surfaces in 8 accordance with the procedures described in chapter 7 of the United 9 States department of housing and urban development guidelines for the 10 evaluation and control of lead-based paint hazards in housing (July 11 2012), or successor regulations, including on chewable surfaces, fric- 12 tion surfaces, and impact surfaces, to determine whether lead-based 13 paint is present, and where such paint is located, in such dwelling 14 unit. 15 11. "Transfer of title" shall mean delivery of a properly executed 16 instrument conveying title to residential real property and shall 17 include delivery of a real estate purchase contract that is a lease or 18 installment land sale contract. 19 § 532. Inspection of residential real property for lead-based paint 20 prior to transfer of title. 1. (a) Effective August first, two thousand 21 twenty-six, every seller of residential real property pursuant to a real 22 estate purchase contract shall deliver to a buyer or buyer's agent prior 23 to the signing by the buyer of a binding contract of sale a certificate 24 that such property has been tested for lead-based paint, and provide the 25 report of such test. The seller shall attach a copy of the certificate 26 containing the signature of the seller and any report of a test for 27 lead-based paint to the real estate purchase contract. The seller shall 28 submit a copy of such certificate and report of such test and any subse- 29 quent reports of such tests to the office authorized under section three 30 hundred seventy-two of this chapter to be registrar of title in the 31 county where such real property is located, and such office shall not 32 accept for filing an instrument of transfer of title unless accompanied 33 by such certificate where applicable. The seller shall also file such 34 certificate and report with the registry established by the department 35 of health pursuant to subdivision one of section thirteen hundred seven- 36 ty-seven of the public health law. The registry shall be publicly acces- 37 sible online, translated consistent with section two hundred two-a of 38 the executive law, and easy to navigate and read by people with an 39 eighth grade education or less. The department of health shall notify 40 the county department of health in the location of the property sale 41 about new entries in the registry coming from property sales. 42 (b) The presentation of a certificate of such test by a prior owner of 43 such property and evidence of filing such certificate and report with 44 the department of health in the county where such residential real prop- 45 erty is located, and with the registry established by the department of 46 health pursuant to subdivision one of section thirteen hundred seventy- 47 seven of the public health law, shall be deemed to be in compliance with 48 the provisions of this subdivision. 49 (c) In the event the seller has not received from a prior owner a 50 certification and report of such tests as set forth in this subdivision, 51 the costs of testing for lead-based paint and the preparation of a 52 certificate and report thereof as provided in this subdivision shall be 53 deductible by the transferor or grantor, up to the amount of five 54 hundred dollars, or in a building with more than one dwelling unit up to 55 four hundred dollars per dwelling unit tested, from the taxes imposed by 56 sections fourteen hundred two and fourteen hundred two-a of the tax law. A. 1529--A 6 1 The transferor or grantor shall not be reimbursed for costs in excess of 2 the total taxes imposed by sections fourteen hundred two and fourteen 3 hundred two-a of the tax law. 4 2. Any provision in a real estate purchase contract or any other docu- 5 ment related to the transfer of title in residential real property that 6 purports to waive any right created under state or federal law for the 7 buyer to conduct a risk assessment or inspection of the property to 8 determine the presence of lead-based paint and/or lead-based paint 9 hazards, or any oral agreement that purports to waive such right, is 10 null and void as against public policy, notwithstanding that such waiv- 11 ers might otherwise be permitted by federal law. 12 3. A certificate that such property has been tested for lead-based 13 paint shall not be required in connection with any of the following 14 transfers of residential real property: 15 (a) A transfer to a beneficiary of a deed of trust; 16 (b) A transfer by a fiduciary in the course of the administration of a 17 decedent's estate, a guardianship, a conservatorship, or a trust; 18 (c) A transfer from one co-owner to one or more other co-owners; 19 (d) A transfer made to the transferor's spouse or to one or more 20 persons in the lineal consanguinity of one or more of the transferors; 21 (e) A transfer between spouses or former spouses as a result of a 22 decree of divorce, dissolution of marriage, annulment, or legal sepa- 23 ration or as a result of property settlement, agreement incidental to a 24 decree of divorce, dissolution of marriage, annulment or legal sepa- 25 ration; 26 (f) A transfer to or from the state, a political subdivision of the 27 state, or another governmental entity; 28 (g) A transfer by a sheriff; 29 (h) A transfer pursuant to a partition action; or 30 (i) A transfer of an unoccupied dwelling unit or residential property 31 that is to be demolished, provided the dwelling unit or property will 32 remain unoccupied until demolition and lead-safe work practices enumer- 33 ated in 40 C.F.R. 745 and successor regulations, or more protective 34 state law are followed during the demolition. 35 4. Nothing contained in this article is intended to prevent the 36 parties to a contract of sale from entering into agreements of any kind 37 or nature with respect to the physical condition of the property to be 38 sold, including, but not limited to, agreements for the sale of real 39 property "as is". 40 § 533. Duty of agent. An agent representing a seller of residential 41 real property as a listing broker, or, if the seller is not represented 42 by an agent, the agent representing the buyer of residential real prop- 43 erty and dealing with a prospective seller, shall have the duty to time- 44 ly (in any event, before the buyer signs a binding contract of sale) 45 inform each seller of the seller's obligations under this article. An 46 agent representing a buyer of residential real property, or, if the 47 buyer is not represented by an agent, the agent representing a seller of 48 residential real property and dealing with a prospective buyer, shall 49 have the duty to timely (in any event, before the buyer signs a binding 50 contract of sale) inform such buyer of the buyer's rights and obli- 51 gations under this article. If an agent performs the duties and obli- 52 gations imposed upon such agent pursuant to this section, the agent 53 shall have no further duties under this article and shall not be liable 54 to any party for a violation of this article. The department of state 55 may, pursuant to section four hundred forty-one-c of this chapter, 56 revoke or suspend the license of an agent who violates this article. A. 1529--A 7 1 § 534. Liability. Nothing contained in this article shall be construed 2 as limiting any existing legal cause of action or remedy at law, in 3 statute or in equity. 4 § 3. The real property law is amended by adding a new section 235-aa 5 to read as follows: 6 § 235-aa. Disclosure of lead-based paint and lead-based paint hazards. 7 1. Prior to executing a residential lease or rental agreement with a 8 tenant, the owner of real property shall provide the tenant a copy of 9 all reports of a test for lead-based paint issued or prepared pursuant 10 to section five hundred thirty-two of this chapter, and any other 11 report, within the possession or control of the owner, pertaining to 12 lead-based paint or lead-based paint hazards within the meaning of 13 section 4852d of title 42 of the United States Code and the regulations 14 thereunder. Owners who deliver a disclosure form with all required docu- 15 ments under the provisions of section 4852d of title 42 of the United 16 States Code and the regulations thereunder shall be deemed to have 17 complied with the requirements of this subdivision. 18 2. Any agreement by a lessee or tenant of premises for dwelling 19 purposes waiving or modifying such lessee or tenant's rights as set 20 forth in this section shall be void as contrary to public policy. 21 3. An owner who violates this section shall be liable for a civil 22 penalty not to exceed ten thousand dollars, and in addition, a penalty 23 to the tenant not to exceed the equivalent of the amount of rental 24 payments for three months plus any attorney's fees. The powers and 25 remedies set forth in this section shall be in addition to all other 26 existing legal cause of action or remedy at law, in statute or in equi- 27 ty. 28 § 4. Subdivision 2 of section 462 of the real property law, as amended 29 by chapter 353 of the laws of 2024, is amended to read as follows: 30 2. The following shall be the disclosure form: 31 PROPERTY CONDITION DISCLOSURE STATEMENT 32 NAME OF SELLER OR SELLERS: 33 PROPERTY ADDRESS: 34 THE PROPERTY CONDITION DISCLOSURE ACT REQUIRES THE SELLER OF RESIDEN- 35 TIAL REAL PROPERTY TO CAUSE THIS DISCLOSURE STATEMENT OR A COPY THEREOF 36 TO BE DELIVERED TO A BUYER OR BUYER'S AGENT PRIOR TO THE SIGNING BY THE 37 BUYER OF A BINDING CONTRACT OF SALE. 38 PURPOSE OF STATEMENT: THIS IS A STATEMENT OF CERTAIN CONDITIONS AND 39 INFORMATION CONCERNING THE PROPERTY KNOWN TO THE SELLER. THIS DISCLOSURE 40 STATEMENT IS NOT A WARRANTY OF ANY KIND BY THE SELLER OR BY ANY AGENT 41 REPRESENTING THE SELLER IN THIS TRANSACTION. IT IS NOT A SUBSTITUTE FOR 42 ANY INSPECTIONS OR TESTS AND THE BUYER IS ENCOURAGED TO OBTAIN [HIS OR 43 HER] THEIR OWN INDEPENDENT PROFESSIONAL INSPECTIONS AND ENVIRONMENTAL 44 TESTS AND ALSO IS ENCOURAGED TO CHECK PUBLIC RECORDS PERTAINING TO THE 45 PROPERTY. 46 A KNOWINGLY FALSE OR INCOMPLETE STATEMENT BY THE SELLER ON THIS FORM 47 MAY SUBJECT THE SELLER TO CLAIMS BY THE BUYER PRIOR TO OR AFTER THE 48 TRANSFER OF TITLE. 49 "RESIDENTIAL REAL PROPERTY" MEANS REAL PROPERTY IMPROVED BY A ONE TO 50 FOUR FAMILY DWELLING USED OR OCCUPIED, OR INTENDED TO BE USED OR OCCU- 51 PIED, WHOLLY OR PARTLY, AS THE HOME OR RESIDENCE OF ONE OR MORE PERSONS, 52 BUT SHALL NOT REFER TO (A) UNIMPROVED REAL PROPERTY UPON WHICH SUCH 53 DWELLINGS ARE TO BE CONSTRUCTED OR (B) CONDOMINIUM UNITS OR COOPERATIVE 54 APARTMENTS OR (C) PROPERTY ON A HOMEOWNERS' ASSOCIATION THAT IS NOT 55 OWNED IN FEE SIMPLE BY THE SELLER. A. 1529--A 8 1 INSTRUCTIONS TO THE SELLER: 2 (a) ANSWER ALL QUESTIONS BASED UPON YOUR ACTUAL KNOWLEDGE. 3 (b) ATTACH ADDITIONAL PAGES WITH YOUR SIGNATURE IF ADDITIONAL SPACE IS 4 REQUIRED. 5 (c) COMPLETE THIS FORM YOURSELF. 6 (d) IF SOME ITEMS DO NOT APPLY TO YOUR PROPERTY, CHECK "NA" (NON-AP- 7 PLICABLE). IF YOU DO NOT KNOW THE ANSWER CHECK "UNKN" (UNKNOWN). 8 SELLER'S STATEMENT: THE SELLER MAKES THE FOLLOWING REPRESENTATIONS TO 9 THE BUYER BASED UPON THE SELLER'S ACTUAL KNOWLEDGE AT THE TIME OF SIGN- 10 ING THIS DOCUMENT. THE SELLER AUTHORIZES [HIS OR HER] THEIR AGENT, IF 11 ANY, TO PROVIDE A COPY OF THIS STATEMENT TO A PROSPECTIVE BUYER OF THE 12 RESIDENTIAL REAL PROPERTY. THE FOLLOWING ARE REPRESENTATIONS MADE BY THE 13 SELLER AND ARE NOT THE REPRESENTATIONS OF THE SELLER'S AGENT. 14 GENERAL INFORMATION 15 1. HOW LONG HAVE YOU OWNED THE PROPERTY? 16 2. HOW LONG HAVE YOU OCCUPIED THE PROPERTY? 17 3. WHAT IS THE AGE OF THE STRUCTURE OR STRUCTURES? NOTE TO BUYER--IF 18 THE STRUCTURE WAS BUILT BEFORE 1978 YOU ARE ENCOURAGED TO INVESTI- 19 GATE FOR THE PRESENCE OF LEAD BASED PAINT HAZARDS. IN ADDITION, NEW 20 YORK REAL PROPERTY LAW REQUIRES THE SELLER TO PRODUCE THE RESULTS 21 OF A TEST OF ALL THE PAINTED SURFACES FOR LEAD, OR TO CONDUCT SUCH 22 TEST IF NOT PREVIOUSLY PERFORMED. 23 4. DOES ANYBODY OTHER THAN YOURSELF HAVE A LEASE, EASEMENT OR ANY 24 OTHER RIGHT TO USE OR OCCUPY ANY PART OF YOUR PROPERTY OTHER THAN 25 THOSE STATED IN DOCUMENTS AVAILABLE IN THE PUBLIC RECORD, SUCH AS 26 RIGHTS TO USE A ROAD OR PATH OR CUT TREES OR CROPS. YES NO UNKN NA 27 5. DOES ANYBODY ELSE CLAIM TO OWN ANY PART OF YOUR PROPERTY? YES NO 28 UNKN NA (IF YES, EXPLAIN BELOW) 29 6. HAS ANYONE DENIED YOU ACCESS TO THE PROPERTY OR MADE A FORMAL LEGAL 30 CLAIM CHALLENGING YOUR TITLE TO THE PROPERTY? YES NO UNKN NA (IF 31 YES, EXPLAIN BELOW) 32 7. ARE THERE ANY FEATURES OF THE PROPERTY SHARED IN COMMON WITH 33 ADJOINING LAND OWNERS OR A HOMEOWNERS ASSOCIATION, SUCH AS WALLS, 34 FENCES OR DRIVEWAYS? YES NO UNKN NA (IF YES DESCRIBE BELOW) 35 8. ARE THERE ANY ELECTRIC OR GAS UTILITY SURCHARGES FOR LINE EXTEN- 36 SIONS, SPECIAL ASSESSMENTS OR HOMEOWNER OR OTHER ASSOCIATION FEES 37 THAT APPLY TO THE PROPERTY? YES NO UNKN NA (IF YES, EXPLAIN BELOW) 38 9. ARE THERE CERTIFICATES OF OCCUPANCY RELATED TO THE PROPERTY? YES 39 NO UNKN NA (IF NO, EXPLAIN BELOW) 40 ENVIRONMENTAL 41 NOTE TO SELLER - IN THIS SECTION, YOU WILL BE ASKED QUESTIONS REGARD- 42 ING PETROLEUM PRODUCTS AND HAZARDOUS OR TOXIC SUBSTANCES THAT YOU KNOW 43 TO HAVE BEEN SPILLED, LEAKED OR OTHERWISE BEEN RELEASED ON THE PROPERTY 44 OR FROM THE PROPERTY ONTO ANY OTHER PROPERTY. PETROLEUM PRODUCTS MAY 45 INCLUDE, BUT ARE NOT LIMITED TO, GASOLINE, DIESEL FUEL, HOME HEATING 46 FUEL, AND LUBRICANTS. HAZARDOUS OR TOXIC SUBSTANCES ARE PRODUCTS OR 47 OTHER MATERIAL THAT COULD POSE SHORT- OR LONG-TERM DANGER TO PERSONAL 48 HEALTH OR THE ENVIRONMENT IF THEY ARE NOT PROPERLY DISPOSED OF, APPLIED 49 OR STORED. THESE INCLUDE, BUT ARE NOT LIMITED TO, FERTILIZERS, PESTI- 50 CIDES AND INSECTICIDES, PAINT INCLUDING PAINT THINNER, VARNISH REMOVER 51 AND WOOD PRESERVATIVES, TREATED WOOD, CONSTRUCTION MATERIALS SUCH AS 52 ASPHALT AND ROOFING MATERIALS, ANTIFREEZE AND OTHER AUTOMOTIVE PRODUCTS, 53 BATTERIES, CLEANING SOLVENTS INCLUDING SEPTIC TANK CLEANERS, HOUSEHOLD A. 1529--A 9 1 CLEANERS, POOL CHEMICALS, PRODUCTS CONTAINING MERCURY AND LEAD AND 2 INDOOR MOLD. 3 NOTE TO BUYER - IF CONTAMINATION OF THIS PROPERTY FROM PETROLEUM 4 PRODUCTS AND/OR HAZARDOUS OR TOXIC SUBSTANCES IS A CONCERN TO YOU, YOU 5 ARE URGED TO CONSIDER SOIL AND GROUNDWATER TESTING OF THIS PROPERTY. IF 6 LEAD IN DRINKING WATER IS A CONCERN TO YOU, YOU ARE URGED TO HAVE THE 7 PLUMBING EXAMINED, INCLUDING THE SERVICE LINE. 8 10. IS ANY OR ALL OF THE PROPERTY LOCATED IN A FEDERAL EMERGENCY 9 MANAGEMENT AGENCY (FEMA) DESIGNATED FLOODPLAIN? YES NO UNKN NA 10 (IF YES, EXPLAIN BELOW) 11 11. IS ANY OR ALL OF THE PROPERTY LOCATED WHOLLY OR PARTIALLY IN THE 12 SPECIAL FLOOD HAZARD AREA ("SFHA"; "100-YEAR FLOODPLAIN") ACCORD- 13 ING TO THE FEDERAL EMERGENCY MANAGEMENT AGENCY'S (FEMA'S) CURRENT 14 FLOOD INSURANCE RATE MAPS FOR YOUR AREA? YES NO UNKN NA (IF YES, 15 EXPLAIN BELOW) 16 12. IS ANY OR ALL OF THE PROPERTY LOCATED WHOLLY OR PARTIALLY IN A 17 MODERATE RISK FLOOD HAZARD AREA ("500-YEAR FLOODPLAIN") ACCORDING 18 TO FEMA'S CURRENT FLOOD INSURANCE RATE MAPS FOR YOUR AREA? YES NO 19 UNKN NA (IF YES, EXPLAIN BELOW) 20 13. IS THE PROPERTY SUBJECT TO ANY REQUIREMENT UNDER FEDERAL LAW TO 21 OBTAIN AND MAINTAIN FLOOD INSURANCE ON THE PROPERTY? YES NO UNKN 22 NA (IF YES, EXPLAIN BELOW) 23 HOMES IN THE SPECIAL FLOOD HAZARD AREA, ALSO KNOWN AS HIGH RISK 24 FLOOD ZONES, ON FEMA'S FLOOD INSURANCE RATE MAPS WITH MORTGAGES 25 FROM FEDERALLY REGULATED OR INSURED LENDERS ARE REQUIRED TO OBTAIN 26 AND MAINTAIN FLOOD INSURANCE. EVEN WHEN NOT REQUIRED, FEMA ENCOUR- 27 AGES HOMEOWNERS IN HIGH RISK, MODERATE RISK, AND LOW RISK FLOOD 28 ZONES TO PURCHASE FLOOD INSURANCE THAT COVERS THE STRUCTURE(S) AND 29 THE PERSONAL PROPERTY WITHIN THE STRUCTURE(S). ALSO NOTE THAT 30 HOMES IN COASTAL AREAS MAY BE SUBJECT TO INCREASED RISK OF FLOOD- 31 ING OVER TIME DUE TO PROJECTED SEA LEVEL RISE AND INCREASED 32 EXTREME STORMS CAUSED BY CLIMATE CHANGE WHICH MAY NOT BE REFLECTED 33 IN CURRENT FLOOD INSURANCE RATE MAPS. 34 14. HAVE YOU EVER RECEIVED ASSISTANCE, OR ARE YOU AWARE OF ANY PREVI- 35 OUS OWNERS RECEIVING ASSISTANCE, FROM THE FEDERAL EMERGENCY 36 MANAGEMENT AGENCY (FEMA), THE U.S. SMALL BUSINESS ADMINISTRATION 37 (SBA), OR ANY OTHER FEDERAL DISASTER FLOOD ASSISTANCE FOR FLOOD 38 DAMAGE TO THE PROPERTY? YES NO UNKN NA (IF YES, EXPLAIN BELOW) FOR 39 PROPERTIES THAT HAVE RECEIVED FEDERAL DISASTER ASSISTANCE, THE 40 REQUIREMENT TO OBTAIN FLOOD INSURANCE PASSES DOWN TO ALL FUTURE 41 OWNERS. FAILURE TO OBTAIN AND MAINTAIN FLOOD INSURANCE CAN RESULT 42 IN AN INDIVIDUAL BEING INELIGIBLE FOR FUTURE ASSISTANCE. 43 15. IS THERE FLOOD INSURANCE ON THE PROPERTY? YES NO UNKN NA (IF YES, 44 ATTACH A COPY OF THE POLICY) 45 A STANDARD HOMEOWNER'S INSURANCE POLICY TYPICALLY DOES NOT COVER 46 FLOOD DAMAGE. YOU ARE ENCOURAGED TO EXAMINE YOUR POLICY TO DETER- 47 MINE WHETHER YOU ARE COVERED. 48 16. IS THERE A FEMA ELEVATION CERTIFICATE AVAILABLE FOR THE PROPERTY? 49 YES NO UNKN NA (IF YES, ATTACH A COPY OF THE CERTIFICATE) 50 AN ELEVATION CERTIFICATE IS A FEMA FORM, COMPLETED BY A LICENSED 51 SURVEYOR OR ENGINEER. THE FORM PROVIDES CRITICAL INFORMATION ABOUT 52 THE FLOOD RISK OF THE PROPERTY AND IS USED BY FLOOD INSURANCE 53 PROVIDERS UNDER THE NATIONAL FLOOD INSURANCE PROGRAM (NFIP) TO 54 HELP DETERMINE THE APPROPRIATE FLOOD INSURANCE RATING FOR THE A. 1529--A 10 1 PROPERTY. A BUYER MAY BE ABLE TO USE THE ELEVATION CERTIFICATE 2 FROM A PREVIOUS OWNER FOR THEIR FLOOD INSURANCE POLICY. 3 17. HAVE YOU EVER FILED A CLAIM FOR FLOOD DAMAGE TO THE PROPERTY WITH 4 ANY INSURANCE PROVIDER, INCLUDING THE NATIONAL FLOOD INSURANCE 5 PROGRAM (NFIP)? YES NO UNKN NA (IF YES, EXPLAIN BELOW) 6 18. IS ANY OR ALL OF THE PROPERTY LOCATED IN A DESIGNATED WETLAND? 7 YES NO UNKN NA (IF YES, EXPLAIN BELOW) 8 19. IS THE PROPERTY LOCATED IN AN AGRICULTURAL DISTRICT? YES NO 9 UNKN NA (IF YES, EXPLAIN BELOW) 10 20. WAS THE PROPERTY EVER THE SITE OF A LANDFILL? YES NO UNKN NA 11 (IF YES, EXPLAIN BELOW) 12 21. ARE THERE OR HAVE THERE EVER BEEN FUEL STORAGE TANKS ABOVE OR 13 BELOW THE GROUND ON THE PROPERTY? YES NO UNKN NA IF YES, 14 ARE THEY CURRENTLY IN USE? YES NO UNKN NA LOCATION(S) ARE THEY 15 LEAKING OR HAVE THEY EVER LEAKED? YES NO UNKN NA (IF YES, 16 EXPLAIN BELOW) 17 22. IS THERE ASBESTOS IN THE STRUCTURE? YES NO UNKN NA (IF YES, STATE 18 LOCATION OR LOCATIONS BELOW) 19 23. IS LEAD PLUMBING PRESENT? YES NO UNKN NA (IF YES, STATE LOCATION 20 OR LOCATIONS BELOW) 21 24. HAS A RADON TEST BEEN DONE? YES NO UNKN NA (IF YES, ATTACH A COPY 22 OF THE REPORT) 23 25. HAS MOTOR FUEL, MOTOR OIL, HOME HEATING FUEL, LUBRICATING OIL OR 24 ANY OTHER PETROLEUM PRODUCT, METHANE GAS, OR ANY HAZARDOUS OR 25 TOXIC SUBSTANCE SPILLED, LEAKED OR OTHERWISE BEEN RELEASED ON 26 THE PROPERTY OR FROM THE PROPERTY ONTO ANY OTHER PROPERTY? YES 27 NO UNKN NA (IF YES, DESCRIBE BELOW) 28 26. HAS THE PROPERTY BEEN TESTED FOR THE PRESENCE OF MOTOR FUEL, MOTOR 29 OIL, HOME HEATING FUEL, LUBRICATING OIL, OR ANY OTHER PETROLEUM 30 PRODUCT, METHANE GAS, OR ANY HAZARDOUS OR TOXIC SUBSTANCE? YES 31 NO UNKN NA (IF YES, ATTACH REPORT(S)) 32 27. HAS THE PROPERTY BEEN TESTED FOR INDOOR MOLD? YES NO UNKN (IF YES, 33 ATTACH A COPY OF THE REPORT) 34 STRUCTURAL 35 28. IS THERE ANY ROT OR WATER DAMAGE TO THE STRUCTURE OR STRUCTURES? 36 YES NO UNKN NA (IF YES, EXPLAIN BELOW) 37 29. IS THERE ANY FIRE OR SMOKE DAMAGE TO THE STRUCTURE OR STRUCTURES? 38 YES NO UNKN NA (IF YES, EXPLAIN BELOW) 39 30. IS THERE ANY TERMITE, INSECT, RODENT OR PEST INFESTATION OR 40 DAMAGE? YES NO UNKN NA (IF YES, EXPLAIN BELOW) 41 31. HAS THE PROPERTY BEEN TESTED FOR TERMITE, INSECT, RODENT OR PEST 42 INFESTATION OR DAMAGE? YES NO UNKN NA (IF YES, PLEASE ATTACH 43 REPORT(S)) 44 32. WHAT IS THE TYPE OF ROOF/ROOF COVERING (SLATE, ASPHALT, OTHER.)? 45 ANY KNOWN MATERIAL DEFECTS? HOW OLD IS THE ROOF? IS THERE A TRANS- 46 FERABLE WARRANTY ON THE ROOF IN EFFECT NOW? YES NO UNKN NA (IF 47 YES, EXPLAIN BELOW) 48 33. ARE THERE ANY KNOWN MATERIAL DEFECTS IN ANY OF THE FOLLOWING 49 STRUCTURAL SYSTEMS: FOOTINGS, BEAMS, GIRDERS, LINTELS, COLUMNS OR 50 PARTITIONS? YES NO UNKN NA (IF YES, EXPLAIN BELOW) 51 MECHANICAL SYSTEMS & SERVICES 52 34. WHAT IS THE WATER SOURCE (CIRCLE ALL THAT APPLY - WELL, PRIVATE, 53 MUNICIPAL, OTHER)? IF MUNICIPAL, IS IT METERED? YES NO UNKN NA A. 1529--A 11 1 35. HAS THE WATER QUALITY AND/OR FLOW RATE BEEN TESTED? YES NO UNKN NA 2 (IF YES, DESCRIBE BELOW) 3 36. WHAT IS THE TYPE OF SEWAGE SYSTEM (CIRCLE ALL THAT APPLY - PUBLIC 4 SEWER, PRIVATE SEWER, SEPTIC OR CESSPOOL)? IF SEPTIC OR CESSPOOL, 5 AGE? ________ DATE LAST PUMPED? ________ FREQUENCY OF PUMPING? 6 ________ ANY KNOWN MATERIAL DEFECTS? YES NO UNKN NA (IF YES, 7 EXPLAIN BELOW) 8 More information on "septic system operation and maintenance" can 9 be found on the NYS Department of Health website in the informa- 10 tional health pamphlet made available by the Department of Health 11 pursuant to section 396-s of NYS general business law. 12 37. WHO IS YOUR ELECTRIC SERVICE PROVIDER? ________ WHAT IS THE AMPER- 13 AGE? ________ DOES IT HAVE CIRCUIT BREAKERS OR FUSES? ________ 14 PRIVATE OR PUBLIC POLES? ________ ANY KNOWN MATERIAL DEFECTS? YES 15 NO UNKN NA (IF YES, EXPLAIN BELOW) 16 38. ARE THERE ANY FLOODING, DRAINAGE OR GRADING PROBLEMS THAT RESULTED 17 IN STANDING WATER ON ANY PORTION OF THE PROPERTY? YES NO UNKN NA 18 (IF YES, STATE LOCATIONS AND EXPLAIN BELOW) 19 39. HAS THE STRUCTURE(S) EXPERIENCED ANY WATER PENETRATION OR DAMAGE 20 DUE TO SEEPAGE OR A NATURAL FLOOD EVENT, SUCH AS FROM HEAVY RAIN- 21 FALL, COASTAL STORM SURGE, TIDAL INUNDATION OR RIVER OVERFLOW? 22 YES NO UNKN NA (IF YES, EXPLAIN BELOW) 23 ARE THERE ANY KNOWN MATERIAL DEFECTS IN ANY OF THE FOLLOWING (IF YES, 24 EXPLAIN BELOW. USE ADDITIONAL SHEETS IF NECESSARY.): 25 40. PLUMBING SYSTEM? YES NO UNKN NA 26 41. SECURITY SYSTEM? YES NO UNKN NA 27 42. CARBON MONOXIDE DETECTOR? YES NO UNKN NA 28 43. SMOKE DETECTOR? YES NO UNKN NA 29 44. FIRE SPRINKLER SYSTEM? YES NO UNKN NA 30 45. SUMP PUMP? YES NO UNKN NA 31 46. FOUNDATION/SLAB? YES NO UNKN NA 32 47. INTERIOR WALLS/CEILINGS? YES NO UNKN NA 33 48. EXTERIOR WALLS OR SIDING? YES NO UNKN NA 34 49. FLOORS? YES NO UNKN NA 35 50. CHIMNEY/FIREPLACE OR STOVE? YES NO UNKN NA 36 51. PATIO/DECK? YES NO UNKN NA 37 52. DRIVEWAY? YES NO UNKN NA 38 53. AIR CONDITIONER? YES NO UNKN NA 39 54. HEATING SYSTEM? YES NO UNKN NA 40 55. HOT WATER HEATER? YES NO UNKN NA 41 56. THE PROPERTY IS LOCATED IN THE FOLLOWING SCHOOL DISTRICT UNKN 42 NOTE: BUYER IS ENCOURAGED TO CHECK PUBLIC RECORDS CONCERNING THE 43 PROPERTY (E.G. TAX RECORDS AND WETLAND AND FEMA'S CURRENT FLOOD 44 INSURANCE RATE MAPS AND ELEVATION CERTIFICATES) 45 THE SELLER SHOULD USE THIS AREA TO FURTHER EXPLAIN ANY ITEM ABOVE. IF 46 NECESSARY, ATTACH ADDITIONAL PAGES AND INDICATE HERE THE NUMBER OF ADDI- 47 TIONAL PAGES ATTACHED. 48 ______________________________________________________________ 49 ______________________________________________________________ 50 ______________________________________________________________ 51 ______________________________________________________________ 52 SELLER'S CERTIFICATION: SELLER CERTIFIES THAT THE INFORMATION IN THIS 53 PROPERTY CONDITION DISCLOSURE STATEMENT IS TRUE AND COMPLETE TO THE 54 SELLER'S ACTUAL KNOWLEDGE AS OF THE DATE SIGNED BY THE SELLER. IF A 55 SELLER OF RESIDENTIAL REAL PROPERTY ACQUIRES KNOWLEDGE WHICH RENDERS 56 MATERIALLY INACCURATE A PROPERTY CONDITION DISCLOSURE STATEMENT PROVIDED A. 1529--A 12 1 PREVIOUSLY, THE SELLER SHALL DELIVER A REVISED PROPERTY CONDITION 2 DISCLOSURE STATEMENT TO THE BUYER AS SOON AS PRACTICABLE. IN NO EVENT, 3 HOWEVER, SHALL A SELLER BE REQUIRED TO PROVIDE A REVISED PROPERTY CONDI- 4 TION DISCLOSURE STATEMENT AFTER THE TRANSFER OF TITLE FROM THE SELLER TO 5 THE BUYER OR OCCUPANCY BY THE BUYER, WHICHEVER IS EARLIER. 6 SELLER__________ DATE___________ 7 SELLER__________ DATE___________ 8 BUYER'S ACKNOWLEDGMENT: BUYER ACKNOWLEDGES RECEIPT OF A COPY OF THIS 9 STATEMENT AND BUYER UNDERSTANDS THAT THIS INFORMATION IS A STATEMENT OF 10 CERTAIN CONDITIONS AND INFORMATION CONCERNING THE PROPERTY KNOWN TO THE 11 SELLER. IT IS NOT A WARRANTY OF ANY KIND BY THE SELLER OR SELLER'S AGENT 12 AND IS NOT A SUBSTITUTE FOR ANY HOME, PEST, RADON OR OTHER INSPECTIONS 13 OR TESTING OF THE PROPERTY OR INSPECTION OF THE PUBLIC RECORDS. 14 BUYER__________ DATE__________ 15 BUYER__________ DATE _________ 16 § 5. This act shall take effect August 1, 2026; provided, however, 17 that if chapter 353 of the laws of 2024 shall not have taken effect on 18 or before such date then section four of this act shall take effect on 19 the same date and in the same manner as such chapter of the laws of 2024 20 takes effect. Effective immediately, the addition, amendment, and/or 21 repeal of any rule or regulation necessary for the implementation of 22 this act on its effective date are authorized to be made and completed 23 on or before such effective date.